District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.127

Proclaimed corporations — Procedure for reinstatement.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 232, ch. 269, § 127
Sept. 3, 1963, 77 Stat. 139, Pub. L. 88-111, § 1(10)
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 29(c), 43 DCR 530
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.127.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.28.
1973 Ed., § 29-938d.